Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,326
Violations; civil penalties; false material statement; penalty; injunction.

(1) Any person who violates the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act, other than a violation of section 81-15,325, shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars for each violation. Any person who fails to pay the fee required under subsection (7) of section 81-15,317 shall also be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars.

(2) A person who knowingly makes a false material statement to the department related to a battery stewardship plan submitted under section 81-15,317 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(3) The Attorney General or the county attorney of any county in which a violation of the act occurs may, in addition to any other penalty, bring an action to enjoin any person from violating the act, other than a violation of section 81-15,325.

(4) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 13.